Massachusetts, session 194th, H5283.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1D of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “languages”, in line 7, the
following words:- , health education
SECTION 2. Paragraph 3 of said section 1D of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended by striking out the fourth sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentence:-
The standards for health education shall be age-appropriate, medically accurate and shall,
at minimum, provide for instruction in the following areas: growth and physical development,
physical activity and fitness, nutrition, reproduction and sexuality, mental health, family life,
interpersonal relationships, disease prevention and control, safety and injury prevention, tobacco,
alcohol, and other substance use and abuse prevention, consumer health and resource
management, ecological health, and community and public health.
of 2

SECTION 3. Consistent with the provisions of section 1E of said chapter 69, the
Massachusetts Comprehensive Health Curriculum Framework shall be construed as a guide for
local school districts in the development and selection of curriculum, textbooks and instructional
materials.
SECTION 4. Section 1I of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the words “nutrition and wellness”, in line 206, and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- health education
SECTION 5. Consistent with the provisions of section 32A of chapter 71, every city,
town, regional school district or vocational school district implementing or maintaining
curriculum which primarily involves human sexual education or human sexuality issues shall
adopt a policy ensuring parental/guardian notification. Such policy shall afford parents or
guardians the flexibility to exempt their children from any portion of said curriculum through
written notification to the school principal. No child so exempted shall be penalized by reason of
such exemption. To the extent practicable, program instruction materials for said curriculum
shall be made reasonably accessible to parents, guardians, educators, school administrators, and
others for inspection and review.
SECTION 6. Nothing in this act shall be construed to require an MCAS exam on health
education.
SECTION 7. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
of 2